Missouri, session 2026, HB3512.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.205, to read as follows:
407.205. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Automatic renewal", a plan, arrangement, or provision of a contract that
contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a paid subscription or purchasing
agreement is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term;
(2) "Automatic renewal offer terms" or "continuous service offer terms", the
following clear and conspicuous disclosures:
(a) That the subscription or purchasing agreement shall continue until the
consumer cancels;
(b) The description of the cancellation policy that applies to the offer;
(c) The recurring charges that shall be charged to the consumer’s credit or debit
card or payment account with a third party as part of the automatic renewal plan or
arrangement, and that the amount of the charge may change, if that is the case, and the
amount to which the charge shall change, if known;
(d) The length of the automatic renewal term or that the service is continuous
unless the length of the term is chosen by the consumer; and
(e) The minimum purchase obligation, if any;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3512 2
(3) "Clear and conspicuous", a larger type than the surrounding text; in
contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size; or set off from
the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks, in a manner that
clearly calls attention to the language;
(4) "Consumer", any individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any
goods, services, moneys, or credit for personal, family, or household purposes;
(5) "Continuous service", a plan, arrangement, or provision of a contract that
contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a paid subscription or purchasing
agreement continues until the consumer cancels the service;
(6) "Free-to-pay conversion", a provision in an offer or agreement to sell or
provide any goods or services under which a customer receives a product or service for
free for an initial period and incurs an obligation to pay for the product or service if
they do not take affirmative action to cancel before the end of that period.
2. It shall be unlawful for any business that makes an automatic renewal offer or
continuous service offer to a consumer in this state to:
(1) Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer
terms in a clear and conspicuous manner before the subscription or purchasing
agreement is fulfilled and in visual proximity, or temporal proximity if the offer is
conveyed by voice, to the request for consent to the offer. If the offer also includes a free
gift or trial, the offer shall include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that
shall be charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the subscription or
purchasing agreement pricing shall change upon conclusion of the trial;
(2) Charge a consumer's credit card, debit card, or account with a third party
for an automatic renewal or continuous service without first obtaining the consumer's
affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic renewal offer terms or
continuous service offer terms, including the terms of an automatic renewal offer or
continuous service offer that is made at a promotional or discounted price for a limited
period of time;
(3) Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal offer
terms or continuous service offer terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding
how to cancel in a manner that the consumer is able to retain. If the automatic renewal
offer or continuous service offer includes a free gift or trial, the business shall also
disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel and allow the consumer to cancel the
automatic renewal or continuous service before the consumer pays for the goods or
services;
(4) Fail to obtain the consumer’s express affirmative consent to the automatic
renewal or continuous service offer terms; or

HB 3512 3
(5) Misrepresent, expressly or by implication, any material fact related to the
transaction including, but not limited to, the inclusion of an automatic renewal or
continuous service, or any material fact related to the underlying good or service.
3. A business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer
shall provide at least one of the following:
(1) A toll-free telephone number;
(2) An email address;
(3) A postal address if the seller directly bills the consumer; or
(4) Other cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation.

The business shall clearly and conspicuously display such contact mechanism in the
acknowledgment, subscription, and purchasing agreement described under this section.
4. A consumer who accepts an automatic renewal or continuous service offer
shall be allowed to terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service through any
of the cancellation mechanisms described under subsection 3 of this section, which shall
include a termination email formatted and provided by the business that a consumer
may send to the business without additional information.
5. For purposes of subsections 3 and 4, providing a discount offer or other
consumer benefit or informing a consumer of the effect of the cancellation shall not be
considered an obstruction or delay, provided that the consumer remains able to cancel
or terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service, as follows:
(1) If a consumer conveys a request to cancel by telephone, the business may
present the consumer with a discounted offer, retention benefit, or information
regarding the effect of cancellation, provided that the business first clearly and
conspicuously informs the consumer that they may complete the cancellation process at
any time by stating that they want to cancel or words to that effect. If the consumer
states their intention to cancel or words to that effect, the business shall promptly
process the cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability
to cancel; or
(2) If a consumer conveys a request to cancel by an online system, the business
may display a discounted offer, retention benefit, or information regarding the effects of
cancellation, provided that the business simultaneously displays a prominently located
and continuously and proximately displayed direct link or button entitled "click to
cancel" or words to that effect, with the presentation of the discounted offer, other
consumer benefit, or information. If the consumer utilizes this direct link or button, the
business shall promptly process the cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or
delay the consumer’s ability to proceed to cancellation.

HB 3512 4
6. The ability to cancel or terminate an automatic renewal or continuous service
under subsections 3 and 4 shall be available to the consumer in the same medium that
the consumer used in the transaction that resulted in the activation of the automatic
renewal or continuous service, or the same medium in which the consumer is
accustomed to interacting with the business including, but not limited to, in person, by
telephone, by mail, or by email. If the activation was by telephone, a telephone number
that is capable of being retained by the consumer shall be available to the consumer to
cancel or terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service. The telephone
number shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed on the company’s website, if
100 applicable.
101 7. In the case of a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal or
102 continuous service accepted by a consumer in this state, the business shall provide the
103 consumer with a clear and conspicuous written notice of the material change and shall
104 provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner that the consumer is able to
105 retain.
106 8. The requirements of this section shall apply only prior to the completion of the
107 initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service, except:
108 (1) The requirement in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section may be
109 fulfilled after completion of the initial order; and
110 (2) The requirement in subsection 7 of this section shall be fulfilled prior to
111 implementation of the material change.
112 9. (1) The attorney general may commence a civil action in a court of competent
113 jurisdiction against any business that violates this section or that commits a deceptive
114 act or practice by failing to provide a simple mechanism for a consumer to cancel the
115 automatic renewal of the subscription or purchasing agreement. In such an action, the
116 business shall be liable for any damages and associated court costs and attorney's fees as
117 determined by the court.
118 (2) The attorney general shall have all powers, rights, and duties regarding
119 violations of this section as are provided in sections 407.010 to 407.130, in addition to
120 rulemaking authority under section 407.145.
121 10. The provisions of this section shall apply to a contract entered into, amended,
122 or extended on or after August 28, 2026.
✔